Idaho statutes. Title 42 IRRIGATION AND DRAINAGE — WATER RIGHTS AND RECLAMATION
Chapter 2 APPROPRIATION OF WATER — PERMITS, CERTIFICATES, AND LICENSES — SURVEY
§ 42-233. Low temperature geothermal resource.

The right to the use of low temperature geothermal resources of this state shall be acquired by appropriation, except as provided in subsection (2) of this section. The appropriation may be perfected by means of the application, permit and license procedure as provided in this chapter for ground water, provided that low temperature geothermal resources shall be utilized primarily for heat value and secondarily for the value as water. Usage of a low temperature geothermal resource primarily for reasons other than heat value is not a beneficial use of the resource, unless the director of the department of water resources exempts the proposed use. The director may exempt a proposed use if the director concludes:

The proposed use will not detrimentally affect existing water rights, including water rights for low temperature geothermal water;

The proposed use will not diminish the temperature of or artesian pressure of the low temperature geothermal aquifer; and

There is no economically viable source of water having a bottom hole temperature of eighty-five (85) degrees or less in a well available.

The use of low temperature geothermal resources for the development and operation of oil and gas wells permitted under section 47-316, Idaho Code, shall not be subject to the provisions of this chapter. However, the director of the department of water resources may initiate a contested case in accordance with the provisions of chapter 52, title 67, Idaho Code, and the rules of procedure promulgated by the department, if the department has reason to believe that an oil and gas well will cause, is causing or has caused significant negative impacts to pressure, temperature, quality necessary for beneficial use or quantity of water available to water rights existing at the time of the development of the oil and gas well or to a water resource that can be beneficially used. The evidence of causation must come from the department or be credible information from a water right or a geothermal resource permit holder existing at the time of the development of the oil and gas well. It shall be the burden of the entity operating the oil and gas well to establish that it will not cause, is not causing and has not caused significant negative impacts to pressure, temperature, quality necessary for beneficial use or quantity of water available to existing water rights existing at the time of the development of the oil and gas well or to a water resource that can be beneficially used. If the director determines that the well will cause, is causing or has caused significant negative impacts to pressure, temperature, quality necessary for beneficial use or quantity of water available to a water right existing at the time of the development of the oil and gas well or to a water resource that can be beneficially used, the director may order the operator to take measures to mitigate those impacts.

Any owner of a well who engages in the drilling, redrilling, modifying or deepening of any low temperature geothermal well shall file with the director of the department of water resources a surety bond or cash bond in the penal sum of not less than five thousand dollars ($5,000) or more than twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) as determined by the director of the department of water resources based on the temperature, depth and pressure of the resource, the size and depth of the well, and any other relevant factors. The surety or cash bond shall be conditioned upon the proper compliance with the provisions of this chapter and chapter 40, title 42, Idaho Code, and rules and regulations promulgated pursuant thereto. The bond shall remain in effect for one (1) year following completion of drilling, redrilling, modifying or deepening of the well or until released in writing by the director, whichever occurs first.
(4) All permits, licenses, decreed rights and valid claims to a right to the use of ground water which would be classified as a low temperature geothermal resource having a priority date prior to July 1, 1987, remain valid and the bond provisions of subsection (3) of this section are not applicable unless the well from which the right diverts water is modified or deepened. The provisions of this section shall not be applicable to all permits, licenses and rights to the use of geothermal resources as defined in chapter 40, title 42, Idaho Code, which would be classified as a low temperature geothermal resource under this section, issued or proclaimed prior to July 1, 1987, and the bond provisions of subsection (3) of this section are not applicable to such wells.

§ 42-233a. “Critical ground water area” defined — Public hearings — Publication of notice — Granting or denial of application — Appeal.

“Critical ground water area” is defined as any ground water basin, or designated part thereof, not having sufficient ground water to provide a reasonably safe supply for irrigation of cultivated lands, or other uses in the basin at the then-current rates of withdrawal, or rates of withdrawal projected by consideration of valid and outstanding applications and permits, as may be determined and designated, from time to time, by the director of the department of water resources.

Upon the designation of a “critical ground water area,” it shall be the duty of the director of the department of water resources to conduct a public hearing in the area concerned to apprise the public of such designation and the reasons therefor. Notice of the hearing shall be published in two (2) consecutive weekly issues of a newspaper of general circulation in the area immediately prior to the date set for hearing.

In the event an area has been designated as a “critical ground water area” and the director of the department of water resources desires to remove such designation or modify the boundaries thereof, he shall likewise conduct a public hearing following similar publication of notice prior to taking such action.

When a “critical ground water area” is designated by the director of the department of water resources, or at any time thereafter during the existence of the designation, the director may approve a ground water management plan for the area. The ground water management plan shall provide for managing the effects of ground water withdrawals on the aquifer from which withdrawals are made and on any other hydraulically connected sources of water.

In the event an application for permit is made with respect to an area that has not been designated as a critical ground water area, the director of the department of water resources shall forthwith issue a permit in accordance with the provisions of section 42-203A and section 42-204, Idaho Code, provided said application otherwise meets the requirements of such sections; and further provided that if the applicant proposes to appropriate water from a ground water basin or basins in an amount which exceeds ten thousand (10,000) acre-feet per year either from a single or a combination of diversion points, and the director determines that the withdrawal of such amount will substantially and adversely affect existing pumping levels of appropriators pumping from such basin or basins, or will substantially and adversely affect the amount of water available for withdrawal from such basin or basins under existing water rights, the director may require that the applicant undertake such recharge of the ground water basin or basins as will offset that withdrawal adversely affecting existing pumping levels or water rights.

In the event an application for permit is made in an area which has been designated as a critical ground water area, if the director of the department of water resources from the investigation made by him on said application as herein provided, or from the investigation made by him in determining the area to be critical, or from other information that has come officially to his attention, has reason to believe that there is insufficient water available subject to appropriation at the location of the proposed well described in the application, the director of the department of water resources may forthwith deny said application; provided, however, that if ground water at such location is available in a lesser amount than that applied for, the director of the department of water resources may issue a permit for the use of such water to the extent that such water is available for such appropriation.
The director may require all water right holders within a critical ground water area to report withdrawals of ground water and other necessary information for the purpose of assisting him in determining available ground water supplies and their usage.

The director, upon determination that the ground water supply is insufficient to meet the demands of water rights within all or portions of a critical ground water area, shall order those water right holders on a time priority basis, within the area determined by the director, to cease or reduce withdrawal of water until such time as the director determines there is sufficient ground water. Water right holders participating in an approved ground water management plan shall not be subject to administration on a time priority basis as long as they are in compliance with the ground water management plan.

Any applicant dissatisfied with the decision of the director of the department of water resources may appeal to the district court in the manner provided for in section 42-237e, Idaho Code.

§ 42-233b. Ground water management area.

“Ground water management area” is defined as any ground water basin or designated part thereof which the director of the department of water resources has determined may be approaching the conditions of a critical ground water area. Upon designation of a ground water management area the director shall publish notice in two (2) consecutive weekly issues of a newspaper of general circulation in the area.

When a ground water management area is designated by the director of the department of water resources, or at any time thereafter during the existence of the designation, the director may approve a ground water management plan for the area. The ground water management plan shall provide for managing the effects of ground water withdrawals on the aquifer from which withdrawals are made and on any other hydraulically connected sources of water.

Applications for permits made within a ground water management area shall be approved by the director only after he has determined on an individual basis that sufficient water is available and that other prior water rights will not be injured.

The director may require all water right holders within a designated water management area to report withdrawals of ground water and other necessary information for the purpose of assisting him in determining available ground water supplies and their usage.

The director, upon determination that the ground water supply is insufficient to meet the demands of water rights within all or portions of a water management area, shall order those water right holders on a time priority basis, within the area determined by the director, to cease or reduce withdrawal of water until such time as the director determines there is sufficient ground water. Water right holders participating in an approved ground water management plan shall not be subject to administration on a time priority basis so long as they are in compliance with the ground water management plan.

§ 42-234. Ground water recharge — Authority of department to grant permits and licenses.

It is the policy of the state of Idaho to promote and encourage the optimum development and augmentation of the water resources of this state. The legislature deems it essential, therefore, that water projects designed to advance this policy be given maximum support. The legislature finds that the use of water to recharge ground water basins in accordance with Idaho law and the state water plan may enhance the full realization of our water resource potential by furthering water conservation and increasing the water available for beneficial use.

The legislature hereby declares that the appropriation of water for purposes of ground water recharge shall constitute a beneficial use of water. The director of the department of water resources is authorized to issue permits and licenses for the purpose of ground water recharge, pursuant to the provisions of this chapter and in compliance with other applicable Idaho law and the state water plan.

The director of the department of water resources may regulate the amount of water which may be diverted for recharge purposes and may reduce such amount, even though there is sufficient water to supply the entire amount originally authorized by permit or license. To facilitate necessary financing of an aquifer recharge project, the director may fix a term of years in the permit or license during which the amount of water authorized to be diverted shall not be reduced by the director under the provisions of this subsection.

To ensure that other water rights are not injured by the operations of an aquifer recharge project, the director of the department of water resources shall have the authority to approve, disapprove or require alterations in the methods employed to achieve ground water recharge. In the event that the director determines that the methods of operation are adversely affecting existing water rights or are creating conditions adverse to the beneficial use of water under existing water rights, the director shall order the cessation of operations until such alterations as may be ordered by the director have been accomplished or such adverse effects otherwise have been corrected.

The legislature further recognizes that incidental ground water recharge benefits are often obtained from the diversion and use of water for various beneficial purposes. However, such incidental recharge may not be used as the basis for claim of a separate or expanded water right. Incidental recharge of aquifers which occurs as a result of water diversion and use that does not exceed the vested water right of water right holders is in the public interest. The values of such incidental recharge shall be considered in the management of the state’s water resources.

§ 42-235. Drilling permits.

Prior to beginning construction of any well, or changing the construction of any well, the driller or well owner shall obtain a permit from the director of the department of water resources to protect the public health, safety and welfare and the environment, and to prevent the waste of water or mixture of water from different aquifers. There shall be a seventy-five dollar ($75.00) charge for the permit if the well is to be used for domestic or monitoring purposes. If the well is to be used for other than domestic or monitoring purposes, the charge for the permit shall be two hundred dollars ($200). All moneys received pursuant to this section shall be credited to the water administration account. The director may provide a blanket drilling permit for site specific monitoring programs which will determine the quality, quantity, temperature, pressure or other attributes of aquifers. The application for a blanket permit shall include a design proposal prepared by a licensed engineer or licensed geologist which shall describe the overall drilling program and all relevant technical features of the wells to the satisfaction of the director. Progress reports, completion and other data may be required as provided by rule. The fee for the blanket permit shall be one hundred dollars ($100) plus an additional fifty dollars ($50.00) per well. A driller or well owner violating any provision of this section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and shall also be subject to the enforcement procedures of section 42-1701B, Idaho Code.

§ 42-236. Form and effect of license. [Repealed.]

§ 42-237. Abandonment of water right — Change of point of diversion and place of use.

The provisions relating to loss of water rights by nonuse and abandonment, as set forth in section 42-222[, Idaho Code], shall apply to ground water rights. The provisions of section 42-222[, Idaho Code], relating to change of point of diversion and change of place of use of water, shall be applicable to waters accruing from water rights, provided, that the withdrawal of waters from the same ground water supply at another location in lieu of withdrawal at the original location shall be considered a change of point of diversion.

§ 42-237a. Powers of the director of the department of water resources.

In the administration and enforcement of this act and in the effectuation of the policy of this state to conserve its ground water resources, the director of the department of water resources in his sole discretion, is empowered:

a. To require all flowing wells to be so capped or equipped with valves that the flow of water can be completely stopped when the wells are not in use.

b. To require both flowing and nonflowing wells to be so constructed and maintained as to prevent the waste of ground waters through leaky wells, casings, pipes, fittings, valves or pumps either above or below the land surface.

c. To prescribe uniform scientific methods to determine water levels in and calculate waters withdrawn from wells.

d. To go upon all lands, both public and private, for the purpose of inspecting wells, pumps, casings, pipes, and fittings, including wells used or claimed to be used for domestic purposes.

e. To order the cessation of use of a well pending the correction of any defect that the director of the department of water resources has ordered corrected.

f. To commence actions to enjoin the illegal opening or excavation of wells or withdrawal or use of water therefrom and to appear and become a party to any action or proceeding pending in any court or administrative agency when it appears to the director of the department of water resources that the determination of such action or proceeding might result in depletion of the ground water resources of the state contrary to the public policy expressed in this act.

g. To supervise and control the exercise and administration of all rights to the use of ground waters and in the exercise of this discretionary power he may initiate administrative proceedings to prohibit or limit the withdrawal of water from any well during any period that he determines that water to fill any water right in said well is not there available. To assist the director of the department of water resources in the administration and enforcement of this act, and in making determinations upon which said orders shall be based, he may establish a ground water pumping level or levels in an area or areas having a common ground water supply as determined by him as hereinafter provided. Water in a well shall not be deemed available to fill a water right therein if withdrawal therefrom of the amount called for by such right would affect, contrary to the declared policy of this act, the present or future use of any prior surface or ground water right or result in the withdrawing of the ground water supply at a rate beyond the reasonably anticipated average rate of future natural recharge. However, the director may allow withdrawal at a rate exceeding the reasonably anticipated rate of future natural recharge if the director finds it is in the public interest and if it satisfies the following criteria:

A program exists or likely will exist which will increase recharge or decrease withdrawals within a time period acceptable to the director to bring withdrawals into balance with recharge.

Holders of senior rights to use ground water will not be caused thereby to pump water from below the established reasonable pumping level or levels.

In connection with his supervision and control of the exercise of ground water rights the director of the department of water resources shall also have the power to determine what areas of the state have a common ground water supply and whenever it is determined that any area has a ground water supply which affects the flow of water in any stream or streams in an organized water district, to incorporate such area in said water district; and whenever it is determined that the ground water in an area having a common ground water supply does not affect the flow of water in any stream in an organized water district, to incorporate such area in a separate water district to be created in the same manner provided for in section 42-604 of title 42, Idaho Code. The administration of water rights within water districts created or enlarged pursuant to this act shall be carried out in accordance with the provisions of title 42, Idaho Code, as the same have been or may hereafter be amended, except that in the administration of ground water rights either the director of the department of water resources or the watermaster in a water district or the director of the department of water resources outside of a water district shall, upon determining that there is not sufficient water in a well to fill a particular ground water right therein by order, limit or prohibit further withdrawals of water under such right as hereinabove provided, and post a copy of said order at the place where such water is withdrawn; provided, that land, not irrigated with underground water, shall not be subject to any allotment, charge, assessment, levy, or budget for, or in connection with, the distribution or delivery of water.
h. To order the installation and maintenance of approved measuring devices consistent with the purposes of section 42-701, Idaho Code.

Section 6 of S.L. 1994, ch. 450 declared an emergency and provided that this act shall apply to all calls for distribution of water pending at the time of passage and approval. Approved April 11, 1994.
CASE NOTES

§ 42-237b. Administrative determination of adverse claims.

Whenever any person owning or claiming the right to the use of any surface or ground water right believes that the use of such right is being adversely affected by one or more user[s] of ground water rights of later priority, or whenever any person owning or having the right to use a ground water right believes that the use of such right is being adversely affected by another’s use of any other water right which is of later priority, such person, as claimant, may make a written statement under oath of such claim to the director of the department of water resources.

Such statement shall include:

The name and post-office address of the claimant.

A description of the water right claimed by the claimant, with amount of water, date of priority, mode of acquisition, and place of use of said right, if said right is for irrigation, a legal description of the lands to which such right is appurtenant.

A similar description of the respondent’s water right so far as is known to the claimant.

A detailed statement in concise language of the facts upon which the claimant founds his belief that the use of his right is being adversely affected.

Upon receipt of such statement, if the director of the department of water resources deems the statement sufficient and meets the above requirements, the director of the department of water resources shall issue a notice setting the matter for hearing before a local ground water board, constituted and formed as in this act provided. The person or persons against whom such claim is directed and who are asserted to be interfering with the claimant’s rights shall in such proceedings be known as respondents. The notice shall be returned to the claimant who shall cause the same to be served upon the respondent together with a copy of the statement. Such service shall be made at least five (5) days before the time fixed for hearing and in the same manner that service of summons is made in a civil action. Proof of service of notice shall be made to the director of the department of water resources by the claimant at least two (2) days before the hearing.

§ 42-237c. Hearing and order.

Hearing on the statement and any answer filed by the respondent shall be had in the county for which such local ground water board was appointed. The hearing shall be conducted before the board under reasonable rules and regulations of procedure prescribed by the director of the department of water resources. All parties to the hearing as well as the board itself shall have the right to subpoena witnesses who shall be sworn by the board and testify under oath at the hearing. All parties to the hearing shall be entitled to be heard in person or by attorney. Upon such hearing the board shall have authority to determine the existence and nature of the respective water rights claimed by the parties and whether the use of the junior right affects, contrary to the declared policy of this act, the use of the senior right. If the board finds that the use of any junior right or rights so affect the use of senior rights, it may order the holders of the junior right or rights to cease using their right during such period or periods as the board may determine and may provide such cessation shall be either in whole or in part or under such conditions for the repayment of water to senior right holders as the board may determine. Any person violating such an order made hereunder shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

§ 42-237d. Local ground water boards.

Whenever a written statement of claim as provided in section 42-237b[, Idaho Code,]hereof is filed with the director of the department of water resources, if the statement of the claimant is deemed sufficient by the director of the department of water resources and meets the requirements of section 42-237b[, Idaho Code], the said director of the department of water resources shall forthwith proceed to form a local ground water board for the purpose of hearing such claim. The said local ground water board shall consist of the director of the department of water resources, and a person who is a qualified engineer or geologist, appointed by the district judge of the judicial district which includes the county in which the well of respondent, or one of the respondents if there be more than one, is located, and a third member to be appointed by the other two, who shall be a resident irrigation farmer of the county in which the well of respondent, or one of the respondents if there be more than one, is located. None of such members shall be persons owning or claiming water right which may be affected by such claim, nor members of the board of directors of any irrigation district or canal company owning or claiming water rights affected by such claims. No employee of the state of Idaho other than said director of the department of water resources is eligible for appointment to a ground water board. Members of the board shall hold office until the board has finally disposed of the claim which it was appointed to hear. Such members shall serve without pay except that members other than the director of the department of water resources shall receive per diem of $25.00 together with reimbursement of expenses actually incurred during the time actually spent in the performance of official duties, such per diem and expenses to be paid from the ground water administration fund [water administration account] hereinafter created. Whenever such a local ground water board is needed to be formed in any county, the director of the department of water resources shall give notice of that fact to the district judge of the judicial district which includes the county in which the well of respondents, or one of the respondents if there be more than one, is located, and thereupon such judge shall appoint a person to be a member of such board. Upon qualification by such member, the third member shall be selected. The director of the department of water resources shall be the chairman of the board and custodian of all its records. He may be represented at any board meeting by a duly appointed, qualified and acting deputy director of the department of water resources.

§ 42-237e. Appeals from actions of the director of the department of water resources.

Any person dissatisfied with any decision, determination, order or action of the director of the department of water resources, watermaster, or of any local ground water board made pursuant to this act may, if a hearing on the matter already has been held, seek judicial review pursuant to section 42-1701A(4), Idaho Code. If a hearing has not been held, any person aggrieved by the action of the director or watermaster may contest such action pursuant to section 42-1701A(3), Idaho Code.

§ 42-237f. Adjudication of water right. — The provisions of sections 42-1401

42-1405, Idaho Code, relative to adjudication of water rights shall be applicable to all water rights acquired under this act.

§ 42-237g. Penalties.

Any person violating any provision of this chapter, or any decision of the director of the department of water resources, or order of a local ground water board, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and any continuing violation shall constitute a separate offense for each day during which such violation occurs, but nothing in this section or in the pendency or completion of any criminal action for enforcement hereof shall be construed to prevent the institution of any administrative enforcement action or civil action for injunctive or other relief for the enforcement of this chapter or the protection of rights to the lawful use of water.

§ 42-237h. Duties of the attorney general.

It shall be the duty of the attorney general to institute and prosecute civil enforcement actions or injunctive actions as provided in this chapter and to prosecute actions or proceedings for the enforcement of any criminal provisions of this chapter. The attorney general may delegate the authority and duty under this section to prosecute criminal actions to the prosecuting attorney of the county in which such a criminal action may arise.